dictionaries/sk_SK-ascii.aff
FLAG num
SFX 395 N 1
SFX 395 it te .
SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 t ac .
SFX 397 N 1
SFX 397 iet eju .
SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 iet ej .
SFX 399 N 1
SFX 399 iet ejme .
SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 iet ejte .
SFX 401 N 1
SFX 401 iet ejuc .
SFX 402 N 1
SFX 402 iet el .
SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 iet ela .
SFX 404 N 1
SFX 404 iet elo .
SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405 iet eli .
SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406 e y .
SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 e ou .
SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 a ence .
SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 a iat .
SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 a eniec .
SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411 a encom .
SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 a encoch .
SFX 413 N 1
SFX 413 a encami .
SFX 414 N 1
SFX 414 0 q .
SFX 415 N 1
SFX 415 ok kovia .
SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 anto iant .
SFX 417 N 1
SFX 417 o y .
SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 ch si .
SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 a ee .
SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 a ich .
SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 a im .
SFX 422 N 1
SFX 422 a imi .
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 a 0 .
PFX 423 Y 1
PFX 423 b bi .
SFX 424 N 1
SFX 424 et tu .
SFX 425 N 1
SFX 425 et te .
SFX 426 N 1
SFX 426 et tom .
SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 et ty .
SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 et tov .
SFX 429 N 1
SFX 429 et toch .
SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 et tami .
SFX 431 N 1
SFX 431 at im .
SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 at is .
SFX 433 N 1
SFX 433 at ia .
SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 at 0 .
SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 at me .
SFX 436 N 1
SFX 436 at te .
SFX 437 N 1
SFX 437 at iac .
SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 mo iem .
SFX 439 Y 1
SFX 439 at ime .
PFX 439 Y 1
PFX 439 0 po .
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 at ite .
PFX 440 Y 1
PFX 440 0 po .
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 at ia .
PFX 441 Y 1
PFX 441 0 po .
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 at im .
PFX 442 Y 1
PFX 442 0 po .
SFX 443 Y 1
SFX 443 at is .
PFX 443 Y 1
PFX 443 0 po .
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 at i .
PFX 444 Y 1
PFX 444 0 po .
SFX 445 N 1
SFX 445 e ch .
SFX 446 N 1
SFX 446 en niam .
SFX 447 N 1
SFX 447 en niach .
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 lo sie .
PFX 448 Y 1
PFX 448 b b .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 lo sie .
PFX 449 Y 1
PFX 449 b najb .
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 y si .
PFX 450 Y 1
PFX 450 bi b .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 ly sieho .
PFX 451 Y 1
PFX 451 b b .
SFX 452 Y 1
SFX 452 ly siemu .
PFX 452 Y 1
PFX 452 b b .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 y som .
PFX 453 Y 1
PFX 453 bi b .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 y sim .
PFX 454 Y 1
PFX 454 bi b .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 y sich .
PFX 455 Y 1
PFX 455 bi b .
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 y simi .
PFX 456 Y 1
PFX 456 bi b .
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 ly sie .
PFX 457 Y 1
PFX 457 b b .
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 y sia .
PFX 458 Y 1
PFX 458 bi b .
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 y sej .
PFX 459 Y 1
PFX 459 bi b .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 y siu .
PFX 460 Y 1
PFX 460 bi b .
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 y sou .
PFX 461 Y 1
PFX 461 bi b .
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 y si .
PFX 462 Y 1
PFX 462 bi najb .
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 ly sieho .
PFX 463 Y 1
PFX 463 b najb .
SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464 ly siemu .
PFX 464 Y 1
PFX 464 b najb .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 y som .
PFX 465 Y 1
PFX 465 bi najb .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 y sim .
PFX 466 Y 1
PFX 466 bi najb .
SFX 467 Y 1
SFX 467 y sich .
PFX 467 Y 1
PFX 467 bi najb .
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 y simi .
PFX 468 Y 1
PFX 468 bi najb .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 ly sie .
PFX 469 Y 1
PFX 469 b najb .
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 y sia .
PFX 470 Y 1
PFX 470 bi najb .
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 y sej .
PFX 471 Y 1
PFX 471 bi najb .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 y siu .
PFX 472 Y 1
PFX 472 bi najb .
SFX 473 Y 1
SFX 473 y sou .
PFX 473 Y 1
PFX 473 bi najb .
SFX 474 N 1
SFX 474 ky iek .
SFX 475 N 1
SFX 475 rum ier .
SFX 476 N 1
SFX 476 t jem .
SFX 477 N 1
SFX 477 t jes .
SFX 478 N 1
SFX 478 t je .
SFX 479 N 1
SFX 479 t jeme .
SFX 480 N 1
SFX 480 t jete .
SFX 481 N 1
SFX 481 iat ajem .
SFX 482 N 1
SFX 482 iat ajes .
SFX 483 N 1
SFX 483 iat aje .
SFX 484 N 1
SFX 484 iat ajeme .
SFX 485 N 1
SFX 485 iat ajete .
SFX 486 N 1
SFX 486 iat aju .
SFX 487 N 1
SFX 487 iat aj .
SFX 488 N 1
SFX 488 iat ajme .
SFX 489 N 1
SFX 489 iat ajte .
SFX 490 N 1
SFX 490 iat ajuc .
SFX 491 N 1
SFX 491 va iev .
SFX 492 N 1
SFX 492 o sie .
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 o sie .
PFX 493 Y 1
PFX 493 0 naj .
SFX 494 N 1
SFX 494 tat cem .
SFX 495 N 1
SFX 495 tat ces .
SFX 496 N 1
SFX 496 tat ce .
SFX 497 N 1
SFX 497 tat ceme .
SFX 498 N 1
SFX 498 tat cete .
SFX 499 N 1
SFX 499 tat cu .
SFX 500 N 1
SFX 500 tat c .
SFX 501 N 1
SFX 501 tat cme .
SFX 502 N 1
SFX 502 tat cte .
SFX 503 N 1
SFX 503 tat cuc .
SFX 504 N 1
SFX 504 y si .
SFX 505 N 1
SFX 505 y sieho .
SFX 506 N 1
SFX 506 y siemu .
SFX 507 N 1
SFX 507 y som .
SFX 508 N 1
SFX 508 y sim .
SFX 509 N 1
SFX 509 y sich .
SFX 510 N 1
SFX 510 y simi .
SFX 511 N 1
SFX 511 y sie .
SFX 512 N 1
SFX 512 y sia .
SFX 513 N 1
SFX 513 y sej .
SFX 514 N 1
SFX 514 y siu .
SFX 515 N 1
SFX 515 y sou .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 y si .
PFX 516 Y 1
PFX 516 0 naj .
SFX 517 Y 1
SFX 517 y sieho .
PFX 517 Y 1
PFX 517 0 naj .
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 y siemu .
PFX 518 Y 1
PFX 518 0 naj .
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 y som .
PFX 519 Y 1
PFX 519 0 naj .
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 y sim .
PFX 520 Y 1
PFX 520 0 naj .
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 y sich .
PFX 521 Y 1
PFX 521 0 naj .
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 y simi .
PFX 522 Y 1
PFX 522 0 naj .
SFX 523 Y 1
SFX 523 y sie .
PFX 523 Y 1
PFX 523 0 naj .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 y sia .
PFX 524 Y 1
PFX 524 0 naj .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 y sej .
PFX 525 Y 1
PFX 525 0 naj .
SFX 526 Y 1
SFX 526 y siu .
PFX 526 Y 1
PFX 526 0 naj .
SFX 527 Y 1
SFX 527 y sou .
PFX 527 Y 1
PFX 527 0 naj .
SFX 528 N 1
SFX 528 on na .
SFX 529 N 1
SFX 529 on novi .
SFX 530 N 1
SFX 530 on nom .
SFX 531 N 1
SFX 531 on ni .
SFX 532 N 1
SFX 532 on nov .
SFX 533 N 1
SFX 533 on noch .
SFX 534 N 1
SFX 534 on nami .
SFX 535 N 1
SFX 535 ko sie .
SFX 536 N 1
SFX 536 ko 0 .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 ko sie .
PFX 537 Y 1
PFX 537 0 naj .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 ko 0 .
PFX 538 Y 1
PFX 538 0 naj .
SFX 539 N 1
SFX 539 ky si .
SFX 540 N 1
SFX 540 ky sieho .
SFX 541 N 1
SFX 541 ky siemu .
SFX 542 N 1
SFX 542 ky som .
SFX 543 N 1
SFX 543 ky sim .
SFX 544 N 1
SFX 544 ky sich .
SFX 545 N 1
SFX 545 ky simi .
SFX 546 N 1
SFX 546 ky sie .
SFX 547 N 1
SFX 547 ky sia .
SFX 548 N 1
SFX 548 ky sej .
SFX 549 N 1
SFX 549 ky siu .
SFX 550 N 1
SFX 550 ky sou .
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 ky si .
PFX 551 Y 1
PFX 551 0 naj .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 ky sieho .
PFX 552 Y 1
PFX 552 0 naj .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 ky siemu .
PFX 553 Y 1
PFX 553 0 naj .
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 ky som .
PFX 554 Y 1
PFX 554 0 naj .
SFX 555 Y 1
SFX 555 ky sim .
PFX 555 Y 1
PFX 555 0 naj .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 ky sich .
PFX 556 Y 1
PFX 556 0 naj .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 ky simi .
PFX 557 Y 1
PFX 557 0 naj .
SFX 558 Y 1
SFX 558 ky sie .
PFX 558 Y 1
PFX 558 0 naj .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 ky sia .
PFX 559 Y 1
PFX 559 0 naj .
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 ky sej .
PFX 560 Y 1
PFX 560 0 naj .
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 ky siu .
PFX 561 Y 1
PFX 561 0 naj .
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 ky sou .
PFX 562 Y 1
PFX 562 0 naj .
SFX 563 N 1
SFX 563 to oho .
SFX 564 N 1
SFX 564 to omu .
SFX 565 N 1
SFX 565 to om .
SFX 566 N 1
SFX 566 to ym .
SFX 567 N 1
SFX 567 o im .
SFX 568 N 1
SFX 568 ko iek .
SFX 569 N 1
SFX 569 ero ier .
SFX 570 N 1
SFX 570 et m .
SFX 571 N 1
SFX 571 et s .
SFX 572 N 1
SFX 572 et 0 .
SFX 573 N 1
SFX 573 et me .
SFX 574 N 1
SFX 574 et a .
SFX 575 N 1
SFX 575 iet 0 .
SFX 576 N 1
SFX 576 iet me .
SFX 577 N 1
SFX 577 iet te .
SFX 578 N 1
SFX 578 et ac .
SFX 579 N 1
SFX 579 o ae .
SFX 580 N 1
SFX 580 ky ok .
SFX 581 N 1
SFX 581 el och .
SFX 582 N 1
SFX 582 rat eriem .
SFX 583 N 1
SFX 583 rat eries .
SFX 584 N 1
SFX 584 rat erie .
SFX 585 N 1
SFX 585 rat erieme .
SFX 586 N 1
SFX 586 rat eriete .
SFX 587 N 1
SFX 587 rat eru .
SFX 588 N 1
SFX 588 rat er .
SFX 589 N 1
SFX 589 rat erme .
SFX 590 N 1
SFX 590 rat erte .
SFX 591 N 1
SFX 591 rat eruc .
SFX 592 N 1
SFX 592 tat ci .
SFX 593 N 1
SFX 593 tat cime .
SFX 594 N 1
SFX 594 tat cite .
SFX 595 N 1
SFX 595 chat sem .
SFX 596 N 1
SFX 596 chat ses .
SFX 597 N 1
SFX 597 chat se .
SFX 598 N 1
SFX 598 chat seme .
SFX 599 N 1
SFX 599 chat sete .
SFX 600 N 1
SFX 600 chat su .
SFX 601 N 1
SFX 601 chat s .
SFX 602 N 1
SFX 602 chat sme .
SFX 603 N 1
SFX 603 chat ste .
SFX 604 N 1
SFX 604 chat suc .
SFX 605 N 1
SFX 605 eno ien .
SFX 606 N 1
SFX 606 a ena .
SFX 607 N 1
SFX 607 a enu .
SFX 608 N 1
SFX 608 a ene .
SFX 609 N 1
SFX 609 a enom .
SFX 610 N 1
SFX 610 a ien .
SFX 611 N 1
SFX 611 a enam .
SFX 612 N 1
SFX 612 a enach .
SFX 613 N 1
SFX 613 a enami .
SFX 614 N 1
SFX 614 eza iez .
SFX 615 N 1
SFX 615 it a .
SFX 616 N 1
SFX 616 it ac .
SFX 617 N 1
SFX 617 no an .
SFX 618 N 1
SFX 618 on nu .
SFX 619 N 1
SFX 619 on ne .
SFX 620 N 1
SFX 620 on ny .
SFX 621 N 1
SFX 621 ta at .
SFX 622 N 1
SFX 622 ea ou .
SFX 623 N 1
SFX 623 rsa s .
SFX 624 N 1
SFX 624 oa uovi .
SFX 625 N 1
SFX 625 oa uom .
SFX 626 N 1
SFX 626 oa uovia .
SFX 627 N 1
SFX 627 oa uov .
SFX 628 N 1
SFX 628 oa uoch .
SFX 629 N 1
SFX 629 a ych .
SFX 630 N 1
SFX 630 a ym .
SFX 631 N 1
SFX 631 a ymi .
SFX 632 N 1
SFX 632 yt udeme .
SFX 633 N 1
SFX 633 yt udete .
SFX 634 N 1
SFX 634 yt udu .
SFX 635 N 1
SFX 635 yt udem .
SFX 636 N 1
SFX 636 yt udes .
SFX 637 N 1
SFX 637 yt ude .
SFX 638 N 1
SFX 638 byt som .
SFX 639 N 1
SFX 639 byt si .
SFX 640 N 1
SFX 640 byt je .
PFX 641 N 1
PFX 641 by jes .
SFX 642 Y 1
SFX 642 0 o .
PFX 642 Y 1
PFX 642 by jes .
SFX 643 N 1
SFX 643 byt sme .
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 0 e .
PFX 644 Y 1
PFX 644 by s .
SFX 645 N 1
SFX 645 byt su .
SFX 646 N 1
SFX 646 yt ud .
SFX 647 N 1
SFX 647 yt udme .
SFX 648 N 1
SFX 648 yt udte .
SFX 649 N 1
SFX 649 byt suc .
SFX 650 N 1
SFX 650 yt ol .
SFX 651 N 1
SFX 651 yt ola .
SFX 652 N 1
SFX 652 yt olo .
SFX 653 N 1
SFX 653 yt oli .
SFX 654 N 1
SFX 654 at ojim .
SFX 655 N 1
SFX 655 at ojis .
SFX 656 N 1
SFX 656 at oji .
SFX 657 N 1
SFX 657 at ojime .
SFX 658 N 1
SFX 658 at ojite .
SFX 659 N 1
SFX 659 at oja .
SFX 660 N 1
SFX 660 at oj .
SFX 661 N 1
SFX 661 at ojme .
SFX 662 N 1
SFX 662 at ojte .
SFX 663 N 1
SFX 663 at ojac .
SFX 664 Y 1
SFX 664 a 0 .
PFX 664 Y 1
PFX 664 c ci .
SFX 665 N 1
SFX 665 ev vi .
SFX 666 N 1
SFX 666 ev vou .
SFX 667 N 1
SFX 667 ev vam .
SFX 668 N 1
SFX 668 ev vach .
SFX 669 N 1
SFX 669 ev vami .
SFX 670 N 1
SFX 670 ov vi .
SFX 671 N 1
SFX 671 ov vou .
SFX 672 N 1
SFX 672 ov vam .
SFX 673 N 1
SFX 673 ov vach .
SFX 674 N 1
SFX 674 ov vami .
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 o 0 .
PFX 675 Y 1
PFX 675 c ci .
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 ovat ujeme .
PFX 676 Y 1
PFX 676 0 po .
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 ovat ujete .
PFX 677 Y 1
PFX 677 0 po .
SFX 678 Y 1
SFX 678 ovat uju .
PFX 678 Y 1
PFX 678 0 po .
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 ovat ujem .
PFX 679 Y 1
PFX 679 0 po .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 ovat ujes .
PFX 680 Y 1
PFX 680 0 po .
SFX 681 Y 1
SFX 681 ovat uje .
PFX 681 Y 1
PFX 681 0 po .
SFX 682 N 1
SFX 682 _on en .
SFX 683 N 1
SFX 683 _ono en .
SFX 684 N 1
SFX 684 iet em .
SFX 685 N 1
SFX 685 iet es .
SFX 686 N 1
SFX 686 iet e .
SFX 687 N 1
SFX 687 iet eme .
SFX 688 N 1
SFX 688 iet ete .
SFX 689 N 1
SFX 689 iet u .
SFX 690 N 1
SFX 690 iet uc .
SFX 691 N 1
SFX 691 ieb eba .
SFX 692 N 1
SFX 692 ieb ebu .
SFX 693 N 1
SFX 693 ieb ebe .
SFX 694 N 1
SFX 694 ieb ebom .
SFX 695 N 1
SFX 695 ieb eby .
SFX 696 N 1
SFX 696 ieb ebov .
SFX 697 N 1
SFX 697 ieb eboch .
SFX 698 N 1
SFX 698 ieb ebmi .
SFX 699 N 1
SFX 699 ol lu .
SFX 700 N 1
SFX 700 ol le .
SFX 701 N 1
SFX 701 ol ly .
SFX 702 N 1
SFX 702 en ny .
SFX 703 N 1
SFX 703 at ta .
SFX 704 N 1
SFX 704 at tu .
SFX 705 N 1
SFX 705 at tom .
SFX 706 N 1
SFX 706 at ty .
SFX 707 N 1
SFX 707 at tov .
SFX 708 N 1
SFX 708 at toch .
SFX 709 N 1
SFX 709 at tami .
SFX 710 N 1
SFX 710 iet ejem .
SFX 711 N 1
SFX 711 iet ejes .
SFX 712 N 1
SFX 712 iet eje .
SFX 713 N 1
SFX 713 iet ejeme .
SFX 714 N 1
SFX 714 iet ejete .
SFX 715 N 1
SFX 715 at iam .
SFX 716 N 1
SFX 716 at ias .
SFX 717 N 1
SFX 717 at iame .
SFX 718 N 1
SFX 718 at iate .
SFX 719 N 1
SFX 719 i mi .
SFX 720 N 1
SFX 720 unt a .
SFX 721 N 1
SFX 721 nt 0 .
SFX 722 N 1
SFX 722 unt om .
SFX 723 N 1
SFX 723 unt 0 .
SFX 724 N 1
SFX 724 unt ach .
SFX 725 N 1
SFX 725 unt ami .
SFX 726 N 1
SFX 726 i ejsi .
SFX 727 N 1
SFX 727 i ejsieho .
SFX 728 N 1
SFX 728 i ejsiemu .
SFX 729 N 1
SFX 729 i ejsom .
SFX 730 N 1
SFX 730 i ejsim .
SFX 731 N 1
SFX 731 i ejsich .
SFX 732 N 1
SFX 732 i ejsimi .
SFX 733 N 1
SFX 733 i ejsie .
SFX 734 N 1
SFX 734 i ejsia .
SFX 735 N 1
SFX 735 i ejsej .
SFX 736 N 1
SFX 736 i ejsiu .
SFX 737 N 1
SFX 737 i ejsou .
SFX 738 Y 1
SFX 738 i ejsi .
